District of Columbia statutes.
9-204.03

Alleys.

The Council shall not name any alley in the District of Columbia except when the alley provides the only access to a residential or commercial property, and except when the Council designates a symbolic name for the alley pursuant to § 9-204.03a.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 403, 30 DCR 148
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-236, § 2(a), 44 DCR 917
1981 Ed., § 7-453.